Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,220
Emergency plan; contents.

Each emergency plan as required in subdivision (1)(c) of section 81-15,217 shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Identification of facilities containing an extremely hazardous substance in an amount which exceeds the threshold planning quantity established for such substance that are within the emergency planning district, identification of routes likely to be used for the transportation of extremely hazardous substances, and identification of additional facilities contributing or subjected to additional risk due to their proximity to facilities subject to the requirements of this section;

(2) Methods and procedures to be followed by facility owners and operators and local emergency response and medical personnel to respond to any release of extremely hazardous substances;

(3) Designation of a community emergency coordinator and identification of facility emergency coordinators who will make determinations necessary to implement the plan;

(4) Procedures providing reliable, effective, and timely notification by the facility emergency coordinators and the community emergency coordinator to persons designated in the emergency plan and to the public that a release has occurred. Notification procedures shall be consistent with the notification requirements of section 81-15,222;

(5) Methods for determining the occurrence of a release and the area or population likely to be affected by the release;

(6) A description of emergency equipment and facilities in the community and at each facility in the community subject to the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act and an identification of the persons responsible for the equipment and facilities;

(7) Evacuation plans, including provisions for a precautionary evacuation and alternative traffic routes;

(8) Training programs, including schedules for training of local emergency response and medical personnel; and

(9) Methods and schedules for exercising the emergency plan.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 30.